Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.429

Professional firefighters and paramedics license plates.

"Professional firefighters and paramedics license plates" means license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol denoting professional firefighters and paramedics.

[ 2011 c 171 s 17; 2004 c 35 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.